Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB811.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. 2024 Kentucky Acts Chapter 175, Part III, General Provisions, 2.
Expenditure of Excess Restricted Funds or Federal Funds Receipts, at pages 1932 to
1933, is amended to read as follows:
2. Expenditure of Excess Restricted Funds [or Federal Funds ]Receipts: If
receipts received or credited to the Restricted Funds accounts [or Federal Funds accounts
]of a budget unit during fiscal year 2024-2025 or fiscal year 2025-2026, and any balance
forwarded to the credit of these same accounts from the previous fiscal year, exceed the
appropriation made by a specific sum for these accounts of the budget unit as provided in
Part I, Operating Budget, of this Act, for the fiscal year in which the excess occurs, the
excess funds in the accounts of the budget unit shall become available for expenditure for
the purpose of the account during the fiscal year only upon compliance with the
conditions and procedures specified in KRS 48.400, 48.500, 48.600, 48.605, 48.620,
48.630, 48.730, and 48.800, and with the authorization of the State Budget Director and
approval of the Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet.
Prior to authorizing the appropriation of any excess, unbudgeted Restricted Funds
pursuant to this section, the State Budget Director and the Secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet shall review the adequacy of the General Fund Surplus Account
with respect to its availability to support authorized expenditures from the General Fund
Surplus Account, known as Necessary Government Expenses. If General Fund Surplus
Account moneys are determined by this review to be adequate to meet known or
anticipated Necessary Government Expenses during fiscal year 2024-2025 or fiscal year
2025-2026, respectively, then the appropriation increase may be approved. If the review
indicates that there are insufficient funds available or reasonably estimated to become
available to the General Fund Surplus Account to meet known or projected Necessary
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/18/2025 10:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1560
Government Expenses for the fiscal years enumerated above, the State Budget Director
and the Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet may disapprove the request
for additional Restricted Funds expenditure authority and may direct the excess
Restricted Funds identified to the General Fund Surplus Account in order to meet
Necessary Government Expense obligations. The results of any review shall be reported
to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue in accordance with KRS
48.400, 48.500, 48.600, 48.605, 48.610, 48.620, 48.630, 48.730, and 48.800.
Any request made by a budget unit pursuant to KRS 48.630 that relates to
Restricted Funds [or Federal Funds ]shall include documentation showing a comparative
statement of revised estimated receipts by fund source and the proposed expenditures by
proposed use, with the appropriated sums specified in the Budget of the Commonwealth,
and statements which explain the cause, source, and use for any variances which may
exist.
Notwithstanding KRS 48.630(2), any request for allotment of unbudgeted
appropriations from any fund source shall be made in writing 14 days in advance of any
allotment revision by the head of the budget unit and transmitted simultaneously to the
State Budget Director and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.
The State Budget Director shall report all approved revisions of unbudgeted
appropriations to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue within 14
days of the revision. This report shall include analysis, including but not limited to the
amount, necessity, remaining unbudgeted funds, and anticipated future needs for
unbudgeted funds.
Each budget unit shall submit its reports in print and electronic format consistent
with the Restricted Funds [and Federal Funds ]records contained in the fiscal biennium
2024-2026 Branch Budget Request Manual and according to the following schedule in
each fiscal year: (a) on or before the beginning of each fiscal year; (b) on or before
October 1; (c) on or before January 1; and (d) on or before April 1.
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/18/2025 10:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1560
Notwithstanding KRS 48.630, no unbudgeted Federal Funds shall be allotted or
expended without the express authority of the General Assembly; any unanticipated
Federal Funds received after January 1, 2025, that were not appropriated in this Act
shall not be expended or appropriated without the express authority of the General
Assembly.
Section 2. Whereas the provisions of this Act provide ongoing support for state
government agencies and their functions, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act
takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise
becoming a law.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/18/2025 10:04 AM Jacketed